Arkansas, session 2025, HB1994.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 18, Chapter 16, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
18-16-416. Compromised leased space — Notification required —
Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Compromised" means that an operator has actual knowledge
that:
(A) A leased space has been forcibly accessed by an
individual other than the occupant, the operator, or an individual authorized
by the occupant or the operator;
(B) Property has been taken from a leased space by an
individual other than the occupant, the operator, or an individual authorized
*ANS378*
04/07/2025 9:12:22 AM ANS378

HB1994
by the occupant or the operator; or
(C) A leased space has been damaged to the extent that
property within the leased space is accessible by an individual other than
the occupant, the operator, or an individual authorized by the occupant or
operator; and
(2) "Individual authorized by the occupant or operator" means an
individual listed on the rental agreement or an individual who has the
applicable key or code to access the leased space.
(b) An operator shall contact an occupant who has a compromised lease
space by telephone, email, or regular mail within five (5) business days of
the operator's actual knowledge that the occupant's leased space has been
compromised.
(c)(1) This section does not impose any responsibility on the operator
for the care, custody, or control of the occupant’s personal property.
(2) The operator does not have a duty or obligation to determine
whether a leased space has been compromised.




















04/07/2025 9:12:22 AM ANS378